Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2706
Education and examination requirements; waiver.

The board may waive the education and examination requirements under section 38-2705 for an applicant who:

(1) Within one hundred eighty days after September 1, 2007, submits evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she has been operating cardiopulmonary bypass systems for cardiac surgical patients as his or her primary function in a licensed health care facility for at least two of the last ten years prior to September 1, 2007;

(2) Submits evidence of holding a current certificate as a Certified Clinical Perfusionist issued by the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor; or

(3) Submits evidence of holding a credential as a perfusionist issued by another state or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia which has standards substantially equivalent to those of this state.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,395.